Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CENTER FOR RURAL POLICY AND DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin $700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for the Center for Rural Policy and Development. new text end